Idaho, session 2025, H0485.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 44-1502, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
44-1502. MINIMUM WAGES. (1) Except as hereinafter otherwise provided
in this section, no employer shall pay to any of his employees any an employee
wages computed at a rate of less than seven dollars and twenty-five cents
($7.25) per hour for employment. The amount of the minimum wage shall con-
form to, and track with, the federal minimum wage:
(a) Twelve dollars ($12.00) per hour, effective July 1, 2025;
(b) Fifteen dollars ($15.00) per hour, effective July 1,2026; and
(c) Seventeen dollars ($17.00) per hour, effective July 1, 2027.
(2) In determining the wage of a tipped employee, the amount of direct
wages paid by an employer to the employee shall be deemed to be increased on
account of tips actually received by the employee; provided however, the di-
rect wages paid to the employee by the employer shall not be in an amount less
than three dollars and thirty-five cents ($3.35) an hour.:
(a) Six dollars ($6.00) per hour, effective July 1, 2025;
(b) Seven dollars ($7.00) per hour, effective July 1,2026; and
(c) Eight dollars ($8.00) per hour, effective July 1, 2027.
(3) If the tips actually received by the a tipped employee combined with
the direct wages paid by the employer to such employee do not at least equal
the minimum wage, as provided in subsection (1) of this section, then the em-
ployer must shall make up the difference. In the event a dispute arises be-
tween the employee and the employer with respect to the amount of tips actu-
ally received by the employee, it shall be the employer's burden to demon-
strate the amount of tips actually received by the employee. Any portion of
tips paid to an employee, which that is shared with other employees under a
tip pooling or similar arrangement, shall not be deemed, for the purpose of
this section, to be tips actually received by the employee.
(3) In lieu of the rate prescribed by subsection (1) of this section,
an employer may pay an employee who has not attained twenty (20) years of
age a wage which is not less than four dollars and twenty-five cents ($4.25)
an hour during the first ninety (90) consecutive calendar days after such
employee is initially employed. No employer may take any action to displace
employees (including partial displacements such as reduction in hours,
wages or employment benefits) for purposes of hiring individuals at the wage
authorized in this subsection.


(4) No political subdivision of this state, as defined by section
6-902, Idaho Code, shall establish by ordinance or other action minimum
wages higher than the minimum wages provided in this section.
(5) Beginning July 1, 2028, and on July 1 of each year thereafter, the
minimum wage shall be adjusted by the change, if any, in the cost of living. A
change in the cost of living shall be calculated based on the consumer price
index for all urban consumers (CPI-U), or its successor index, as published
by the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, or its
successor agency. The percentage change in the CPI-U shall be calculated
as of February of each year as compared to February of the year before. Any
change in the minimum wage shall be rounded to the nearest five cents (5¢).
The director of the Idaho department of labor shall make the calculation re-
quired by this subsection and shall publish the adjusted minimum wage on the
Idaho department of labor website by April 15 of each year.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.